Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3419.1 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, the term "financial institution"
means banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, and
credit unions in this state whose deposits are insured by the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National Credit Union
Administration or any successor institutions. Such financial
institution shall be in good standing, conduct regular banking
business, and shall collect such drafts, bills of exchange, and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3557 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

chec ks as may be deposited by the local entity or division in the
regular course of business. Such financial institution shall pay
all checks and drafts legally authorized and duly drawn on the funds
deposited.
B. The Oklahoma Agricultural Extension Division shall not,
directly or as a condition of providing Oklahoma Agricultural
Extension Division services or providing access to Oklahoma
Agricultural Experiment Station programming, require funding
generated at the local county level, as described by subsection C of
this section, to be:
1. Centralized at the Division or Station; or
2. Directed or expended outside the county in which the funding
was generated.
C. Each local entity or division of the county extension
service system, including any unincorporated association, nonprofit
entity or other legal entity assisting with fundraising activities
for the benefit of a local entity or division of the county
extension service system which receives an allocation of state funds
through the Oklahoma Agricultural Extension Division is authorized
to select a financial institution within the State of Oklahoma and
establish one or more accounts at the same for funds generated,
raised, or collected at the local county level to pay expenses
related to the services delivered through the county extension
service system.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3557 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. No state appropriated or federal funds shall be deposited in
any account owned or controlled by a local entity or division of the
county extension service system.
E. Accounts established under subsection C of this section are
authorized to retain interest, and the interest income shall not be
used for any purpose inconsistent with the terms of the account as
provided in the agreement with the applicable financial institution.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
April 13, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3557 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)